Illinois, session 104th, SB2009.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Sections 1-136.8 and 11-1433 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/1-136.8 new)7    Sec. 1-136.8. Leader follower attenuator truck.A 8driverless vehicle that is led by a human-driven vehicle that 9controls its position, speed, and heading data to the 10driverless vehicle while maintaining a set gap distance and is 11be equipped with sensors that can detect obstacles to stop the 12driverless vehicle if necessary. 13    (625 ILCS 5/11-1433 new)14    Sec. 11-1433. Use of leader follower attenuator trucks on 15State highways. The Department and the Illinois State Toll 16Highway Authority may use leader follower attenuator trucks on 17State highways to increase safety of workers in construction 18and maintenance zones.